Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.040

Application for license.

An application for license shall be made to the department upon forms provided by it and shall contain such information as the department reasonably requires, which may include affirmative evidence of ability to comply with the rules and regulations as are lawfully prescribed hereunder.

[ 1953 c 160 s 3; 1951 c 117 s 5.]